Utah statutes.
53A-17a-114.   Career and technical education program alternatives.

(1)  A secondary student may attend a campus of the Utah College of Applied Technology created under Title 53B, Chapter 2a, Utah College of Applied Technology, if the secondary student's career and technical education goals are better achieved by attending the Utah College of Applied Technology as determined by:

(a)  the secondary student; and

(b)  if the secondary student is a minor, the secondary student's parent or legal guardian.

(2)  Beginning with the school year that occurs during the fiscal year that begins on July 1, 2011 and ends on June 30, 2012, a secondary student served under this section in a campus of the Utah College of Applied Technology shall be counted in the average daily membership of the sending school district or charter school.



Amended by Chapter 288, 2012 General Session

